ro-RO: Tip bicicletă compatibil: Downhill; Electric; Hibrid; Munte; Stradă; Altele
de: Kompatibler Fahrradtyp: Downhill; Elektrisch; Hybrid; Berg; Rennrad; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di bicicletta compatibile: Discesa; Elettrico; Ibrido; Montagna; Strada; Altro
es: Tipo de bicicleta compatible: Descenso; Eléctrico; Híbrido; Montaña; Carretera; Otros
da: Kompatibel cykeltype: Downhill; Elektrisk; Hybrid; Bjerg; Landevej; Andet
lt-LT: Suderinamas dviračio tipas: Nuokalnės; Elektrinis; Hibridinė; Kalnų; Plentinis; Kita
ja: 適合するバイクの種類: ダウンヒル; 電気; ハイブリッド; マウンテン; ロード; その他
fi: Yhteensopiva pyörätyyppi: Alamäki; Sähkö; Hybridi; Vuoristoinen; Maantie; Muu
nl: Compatibel fietstype: Bergafwaarts; Elektrisch; Hybride; Berg; Weg; Andere
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ bicykla: Z kopca; Elektrický; Hybridný; Hora; Cesta; Iné
sv: Kompatibel cykeltyp: Utför; Elektrisk; Hybrid; Fjäll; Väg; Övrigt
nb: Kompatibel sykkeltype: Nedoverbakke; Elektrisk; Hybrid; Fjell; Landevei; Annet
fr: Type de vélo compatible: Descente; Électrique; Hybrid; Montagne; Road; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместим тип велосипед: Спускане; Електрическо; Хибрид; Планински; Шосеен; Други
en: Compatible bike type: Downhill; Electric; Hybrid; Mountain; Road; Other
tr: Uyumlu Bisiklet Tipi: Yokuş aşağı; Akülü; Hibrit; Dağ; Yol; Diğer
ru: Совместимый тип велосипеда: Подъем; Электрический; Гибридные; Горный; Шоссейный; Другой
ko: 호환 가능한 자전거 유형: 내리막; 전자식; 하이브리드; 산악; 로드; 기타
zh-TW: 相容自行車類型: 下坡; 電動式; 混合; 山; 路; 其他
vi: Loại xe đạp tương thích: Đổ đèo; Xe lăn điện; Ván kết hợp; Núi; Đua; Khác
el: Συμβατός τύπος ποδηλάτου: Κατάβασης βουνού; Ηλεκτρικό; Υβριδικό; Βουνού; Δρόμου; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de bicicleta compatível: Descida; Elétrica; Híbrida; Montanha; Estrada; Outro
pl: Zgodny typ roweru: Zjazdowy; Elektryczny; Hybrydowy; Górski; Szosowy; Inne
sl-SI: Združljiv tip kolesa: Downhill; Električno; Hibridno; Gorski; Cestni; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de bicicleta compatível: Descida; Elétrico; Híbrido; Montanha; Estrada; Outro
zh-CN: 适用自行车类型: 下坡; 电动; 混合型; 山地; 公路; 其他
th: ประเภทจักรยานที่รองรับ: ดาวน์ฮิล; ไฟฟ้า; แบบไฮบริด; ภูเขา; เสือหมอบ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta bicikla: Downhill; Električni; Hibridni; Brdski; Cestovni; Ostalo
hu: Kompatibilis kerékpár típusa: Downhill; Elektromos; Hibrid; Hegyi; Közúti; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilní typ kola: Sjezdové; Elektrický; Hybridní; Horský; Silniční; Jiné